Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20269-1003
Nebraska Commission on Problem Gambling; created; members; terms; vacancies; meetings.

(1) The Nebraska Commission on Problem Gambling is created. For administrative purposes only, the Nebraska Commission on Problem Gambling shall be within the State Racing and Gaming Commission. The Nebraska Commission on Problem Gambling shall have nine members appointed by the Governor as provided in this section, subject to confirmation by a majority of the members of the Legislature. The members of the Nebraska Commission on Problem Gambling shall have no pecuniary interest, either directly or indirectly, in a contract with the program providing services to problem gamblers and shall not be employed by the Nebraska Commission on Problem Gambling or the State Racing and Gaming Commission.

(2) By July 1, 2013, the Governor shall appoint members of the Nebraska Commission on Problem Gambling as follows:

(a) One member with medical care or mental health expertise;

(b) One member with expertise in banking and finance;

(c) One member with legal expertise;

(d) One member with expertise in the field of education;

(e) Two members who are consumers of problem gambling services;

(f) One member with data analysis expertise; and

(g) Two members who are residents of the state and are representative of the public at large.

(3) The terms of the members shall be for three years, except that the Governor shall designate three of the initial appointees to serve initial terms beginning on July 1, 2013, and ending on March 1, 2014, three of the initial appointees to serve initial terms beginning on July 1, 2013, and ending on March 1, 2015, and three of the initial appointees to serve initial terms beginning on July 1, 2013, and ending on March 1, 2016. The Governor shall appoint members to fill vacancies in the same manner as the original appointments, and such appointees shall serve for the remainder of the unexpired term.

(4) Beginning July 1, 2013, the commission shall adopt bylaws governing its operation and the commission shall meet at least four times each calendar year and may meet more often on the call of the chairperson. Each member shall attend at least two meetings each calendar year and shall be subject to removal for failure to attend at least two meetings unless excused by a majority of the members of the commission. Meetings of the commission are subject to the Open Meetings Act.

Laws 2013, LB6, § 3;

Laws 2026, LB1001, § 35.
July 1, 2026
Open Meetings Act, see section 84-1407.